Utah statutes.
76-6-704.   Attorney general, county attorney, or district attorney to prosecute -- Conduct violating other statutes.

(1)  The attorney general, district attorney, or the county attorney shall prosecute suspected criminal violations of this part.

(2)  Prosecution under this part does not prevent any prosecutions under any other law.



Amended by Chapter 38, 1993 General Session

